en: Bicycle Wheels
xx: Bicycle Wheels
cs: Kola na jízdní kola
da: Cykelhjul
de: Fahrradräder
es: Ruedas para bicicletas
fr: Roues de vélo
it: Ruote per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ホイール
nl: Fietswielen
no: Sykkelhjul
pl: Koła rowerowe
pt: Rodas de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные колеса
sv: Cykelhjul
tr: Bisiklet Tekerlekleri

en: Bicycles
xx: Bicycles
cs: Jízdní kola
da: Cykler
de: Fahrräder
es: Bicicletas
fr: Vélos, Vélo
it: Biciclette
ja: 自転車
nl: Fietsen
no: Sykler
pl: Rowery
pt: Bicicletas
ru: Велосипеды
sv: Cyklar
tr: Bisikletler

en: Cycling Apparel & Accessories, Bike equipment
xx: Cycling Apparel & Accessories
cs: Cyklistické oblečení a příslušenství
da: Cykeludstyr
de: Fahrradbekleidung & Zubehör, Fahrradausrüstung
es: Accesorios y complementos de ciclismo, Equipo de bicicleta
fr: Équipement et accessoires de cyclisme, Équipement de vélo
it: Abbigliamento e accessori da ciclismo
ja: 自転車ウェア・小物
nl: Fietskleding en -accessoires
no: Sykkelklær og -tilbehør
pl: Odzież i akcesoria dla rowerzystów
pt: Acessórios e roupas para ciclismo
ru: Экипировка и принадлежности для велосипедного спорта
sv: Cykelutrustning
tr: Bisiklet Kıyafetleri ve Aksesuarları

en: Bicycle Cleat Accessories
xx: Bicycle Cleat Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke kufrům do pedálů kola
da: Tilbehør til cykelklamper
de: Schuhplatten-Zubehör
es: Accesorios de calapiés para bicicletas
fr: Accessoires pour pédales de vélo
it: Accessori per scarpe da ciclista
ja: 自転車用クリート関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor fietsschoenplaatjes
no: Tilbehør til pedalklosser for sykkel
pl: Akcesoria do pedałów zatrzaskowych
pt: Acessórios de tacos para sapatilhas
ru: Принадлежности для шипов для велотуфель
sv: Broddtillbehör för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Pedal Kilidi Aksesuarları

en: Bicycle Cleat Bolts
xx: Bicycle Cleat Bolts
cs: Šrouby ke kufrům do pedálů kola
da: Bolte til cykelklamper
de: Schuhplatten-Schrauben
es: Tornillos de calapiés para bicicletas
fr: Boulons de fixation de cales de pédales
it: Tacchette per scarpe da ciclista
ja: 自転車用クリート取付ボルト
nl: Boutjes voor fietsschoenplaatjes
no: Bolter til pedalklosser for sykkel
pl: Śruby mocujące
pt: Parafusos de tacos para sapatilhas
ru: Болты для шипов для велотуфель
sv: Broddbultar för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Pedal Kilidi Cıvataları

en: Bicycle Cleat Covers
xx: Bicycle Cleat Covers
cs: Kryty na kufry do pedálů kola
da: Covers til cykelklamper
de: Schuhplatten-Schutzhüllen
es: Cubiertas de calapiés para bicicletas
fr: Protège-cales
it: Coperture per scarpe da ciclista
ja: 自転車用クリートカバー
nl: Beschermkapjes voor fietsschoenplaatjes
no: Overtrekk til pedalklosser for sykkel
pl: Osłony na pedały zatrzaskowe
pt: Protetores de tacos para sapatilhas
ru: Крышки для шипов для велотуфель
sv: Broddskydd för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Pedal Kilidi Kapakları

en: Bicycle Cleat Shims & Wedges
xx: Bicycle Cleat Shims & Wedges
cs: Vložky a klíny ke kufrům do pedálů kola
da: Justeringsstykker og afstandsstykker til cykelklamper
de: Schuhplatten-Klemmen & -Keile
es: Cuñas y calzas de calapiés para bicicletas
fr: Cales de pédales
it: Cunei e zeppe per scarpe da ciclista
ja: 自転車用クリートシム・クリートウェッジ
nl: Ringen en stelboutjes voor fietsschoenplaatjes
no: Skiver/shims til pedalklosser for sykkel
pl: Podkładki do pedałów zatrzaskowych
pt: Calços para sapatilhas
ru: Шайбы и стержни для шипов для велотуфель
sv: Mellanlägg och kilar för cykelbroddar
tr: Bisiklet Pedal Kilidi Şimleri ve Kamaları

en: Bicycle Cleats
xx: Bicycle Cleats
cs: Cyklistické kufry
da: Cykelklamper
de: Schuhplatten
es: Calas para bicicleta
fr: Crampons de cyclisme
it: Tacchetti per scarpe da ciclismo
ja: 自転車用クリート
nl: Fietsschoenplaatjes
no: Skoklips
pl: Wpinane buty rowerowe
pt: Presilhas de bicicleta
ru: Шипы для велотуфель
sv: Tåstöd för cykelpedaler
tr: Bisiklet Pençe Ayakkabıları

en: Bicycle Gloves
xx: Bicycle Gloves
cs: Cyklistické rukavice
da: Cykelhandsker
de: Fahrradhandschuhe
es: Guantes de ciclismo
fr: Gants de cyclisme, Gants de sport
it: Guanti da ciclista
ja: 自転車用グローブ
nl: Fietshandschoenen
no: Sykkelhansker
pl: Rękawiczki rowerowe
pt: Luvas para ciclismo
ru: Велосипедные перчатки
sv: Cykelhandskar
tr: Bisiklet Eldivenleri

en: Bicycle Helmet Parts & Accessories
xx: Bicycle Helmet Parts & Accessories
cs: Díly a příslušenství pro cyklistické přilby
da: Dele og tilbehør til cykelhjelme
de: Fahrradhelmteile und -zubehör
es: Accesorios y repuestos para cascos de bicicleta
fr: Accessoires et pièces de rechange pour casques de vélo
it: Componenti e accessori per caschi per biciclette
ja: 自転車用ヘルメット向け部品/アクセサリー
nl: Onderdelen en accessoires voor fietshelmen
no: Deler og tilbehør til sykkelhjelmer
pl: Części i akcesoria do hełmów rowerowych
pt: Acessórios e peças de capacetes de ciclismo
ru: Запчасти и приспособления для велосипедных шлемов
sv: Delar och tillbehör till cykelhjälm
tr: Bisiklet Kaskı Parçaları ve Aksesuarları

en: Bicycle Helmets
xx: Bicycle Helmets
cs: Cyklistické helmy
da: Cykelhjelme
de: Fahrradhelme
es: Cascos de ciclismo
fr: Casques de cyclisme, Casque de vélo, casque de vélo
it: Caschi da bicicletta
ja: 自転車用ヘルメット
nl: Fietshelmen
no: Sykkelhjelmer
pl: Kaski rowerowe
pt: Capacetes para ciclismo
ru: Велосипедные шлемы
sv: Cykelhjälmar
tr: Bisiklet Kaskları

en: Bicycle Protective Pads
xx: Bicycle Protective Pads
cs: Cyklistické chrániče
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til cykling
de: Fahrrad-Schutzpolster
es: Protecciones acolchadas para bicicletas
fr: Protections du cycliste
it: Cuscinetti protettivi per ciclisti
ja: 自転車用プロテクター
nl: Beschermpads voor fietssport
no: Beskyttelsesputer til sykling
pl: Ochraniacze rowerowe
pt: Acessórios de proteção para ciclismo
ru: Щитки для велосипедистов
sv: Skyddsutrustning för cykling
tr: Bisiklet Koruyucu Pedleri

en: Bicycle Shoe Covers
xx: Bicycle Shoe Covers
cs: Cyklistické návleky na boty
da: Cykelskoovertræk
de: Fahrradüberschuhe
es: Sobrecalzado de ciclismo
fr: Sur-chaussures de cyclisme
it: Copriscarpe da ciclista
ja: 自転車用シューズカバー
nl: Fietsoverschoenen
no: Sykkelskotrekk
pl: Pokrowce na buty rowerowe
pt: Coberturas para calçados para ciclismo
ru: Велосипедные бахилы
sv: Cykelskoskydd
tr: Bisiklet Ayakkabısı Kılıfları

en: Tricycle Accessories
xx: Tricycle Accessories
cs: Tříkolky – příslušenství
da: Trehjulet cykel – tilbehør
de: Dreiradzubehör
es: Accesorios para triciclos
fr: Accessoires de tricycles
it: Accessori per tricicli
ja: 三輪車関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor driewielers
no: Tilbehør til trehjulssykler
pl: Akcesoria do rowerów trójkołowych
pt: Acessórios para triciclos
ru: Принадлежности для трехколесных велосипедов
sv: Tillbehör till trehjulingar
tr: Üçteker Aksesuarları

en: Tricycles
xx: Tricycles
cs: Tříkolky
da: Trehjulede cykler
de: Dreiräder
es: Triciclos
fr: Tricycles
it: Tricicli
ja: 三輪車
nl: Driewielers
no: Trehjulssykler
pl: Rowery trójkołowe
pt: Triciclos
ru: Трехколесные велосипеды
sv: Trehjulingar
tr: Üçtekerler

en: Unicycle Accessories
xx: Unicycle Accessories
cs: Jednokolky – příslušenství
da: Ethjulede cykler – tilbehør
de: Einradzubehör
es: Accesorios para monociclos
fr: Accessoires monocycles
it: Accessori monocicli
ja: 一輪車関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor eenwielers
no: Tilbehør til etthjulssykler
pl: Akcesoria do rowerów jednokołowych
pt: Acessórios para monociclos
ru: Принадлежности для одноколесных велосипедов
sv: Tillbehör till enhjulingar
tr: Unisiklet Aksesuarları

en: Unicycles
xx: Unicycles
cs: Jednokolky
da: Ethjulede cykler
de: Einräder
es: Monociclos
fr: Monocycles, Gyroroue électrique
it: Monocicli
ja: 一輪車
nl: Eenwielers
no: Etthjulssykler
pl: Rowery jednokołowe
pt: Monociclos
ru: Одноколесные велосипеды
sv: Enhjulingar
tr: Unisikletler

en: Equestrian
xx: Equestrian
cs: Jezdectví
da: Dressur
de: Reitsportzubehör
es: Equitación
fr: Équitation
it: Equitazione
ja: 乗馬
nl: Paardensport
no: Ridning
pl: Jeździectwo
pt: Esportes equestres
ru: Конный спорт
sv: Hästsport
tr: Binicilik

en: Horse Care
xx: Horse Care
cs: Potřeby pro koně
da: Produkter til hestepleje
de: Pferdebedarf
es: Cuidado de caballos
fr: Articles pour chevaux
it: Cura dei cavalli
ja: 馬用品
nl: Verzorging van paarden
no: Hesteutstyr
pl: Produkty do pielęgnacji koni
pt: Suprimentos para cavalos
ru: Товары для ухода за лошадьми
sv: Hästutrustning
tr: At Bakım Ürünleri

en: Horse Blankets & Sheets
xx: Horse Blankets & Sheets
cs: Deky a přikrývky na koně
da: Hestedækkener og tæpper
de: Abreitdecken & Weidedecken
es: Mantas y capas para caballos
fr: Couvertures pour chevaux
it: Coperte e lenzuola per cavalli
ja: 馬用毛布・シーツ
nl: Paardendekens en -kleden
no: Hestedekken og -tepper
pl: Derki i koce dla koni
pt: Cobertores para cavalos
ru: Одеяла для лошадей
sv: Hästfiltar och hästtäcken
tr: At Battaniye ve Örtüleri